Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.92.090

Action in superior court—Venue—Joint action.

(1) After exhaustion of the time period in RCW 29A.92.080, any voter who resides in a political subdivision, organization whose roster of members and volunteers includes a voter who resides in the political subdivision, or tribe located at least in part in the political subdivision where a violation of RCW 29A.92.020 is alleged may file an action in the superior court of the county in which the political subdivision is located. If the action is against a county, the action may be filed in the superior court of such county, or in the superior court of either of the two nearest judicial districts as determined pursuant to RCW 36.01.050(2). An action filed pursuant to this chapter does not need to be filed as a class action.

(2) A coalition of members of different protected classes may file an action jointly pursuant to this chapter if they demonstrate that the combined voting preferences of the multiple protected classes are polarized against the rest of the electorate. A coalition of members of different protected classes is not required to demonstrate that each individual racial, color, or language minority group which comprises the coalition is cohesive.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to relieve a party of the requirement to establish standing as provided in Washington case law when commencing an action under this title.

[ 2023 c 56 s 6; 2019 c 64 s 12; 2018 c 113 s 401.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 56: See note following RCW 29A.92.720.

Explanatory statement—2019 c 64: See note following RCW 1.20.110.